Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,109
Income tax; refusal to file return; refusal to produce records; Tax Commissioner; powers; contempt proceedings.

(1) If any person willfully refuses to file an income tax return required by the provisions of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, the Tax Commissioner may apply to a judge of the district court for the county in which the person resides, or, in the case of a corporation, the county in which it has its principal place of business in Nebraska, for an order directing such person to file the required return. If such person fails or refuses to obey such order, he shall be guilty of contempt of court.

(2) If any person willfully refuses to make available any books, papers, records or memoranda for examination by the Tax Commissioner or his representative, or willfully refuses to attend and testify, pursuant to the powers conferred on the Tax Commissioner by subsection (3) of section 77-27,119, the Tax Commissioner may apply to a judge of the district court for the county where such person resides, for an order directing such person to comply with the Tax Commissioner's request for books, papers, records or memoranda or for his attendance and testimony. If the books, papers, records or memoranda required by the Tax Commissioner are in the custody of a corporation, the order of the court may be directed to any principal officer of such corporation. If a person fails or refuses to obey such order, he shall be guilty of contempt of court.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 109, p. 1624.